Nebraska, session 109, LB20.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Agricultural or horticultural purposes has the same meaning as in
section 77-1359;
(b) Agricultural self-generation facility means a facility for the
production of electricity that:
(i) Uses methane, wind, solar, biomass, hydropower, or geothermal
resources as its energy source;
(ii) Is controlled by the owner-generator and located entirely on the same
premises as the owner-generator's electric account with the local distribution
utility;
(iii) Is owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the owner-generator and
used for agricultural or horticultural purposes;
(iv) Has a rated capacity of one hundred kilowatts or less;
(v) Utilizes a device which prevents any backfeed of electricity to the
local distribution system; and
(vi) Is not used for purposes of net metering;
(c) Local distribution system means the equipment and facilities used by a
local distribution utility to distribute electricity to end-use customers;
(d) Local distribution utility means the owner or operator of a local
distribution system. Local distribution utility includes a public power
district, a public power and irrigation district, an electric cooperative, or a
municipal electric system;
(e) Net metering has the same meaning as in section 70-2002; and
(f) Owner-generator means the person controlling an agricultural self-
generation facility.
(2) No local distribution utility shall deny or refuse electric service to
a customer that owns an agricultural self-generation facility. An owner-
generator is subject to the interconnection requirements, safety standards,
electric rates and charges, and service agreement requirements of the local
distribution utility in whose service area the agricultural self-generation
facility is located. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit
a local distribution utility from establishing the rates or fees necessary to
fully cover its costs to serve a customer that is an owner-generator.
(3) An owner-generator shall notify the local distribution utility of such
owner-generator's intent to install an agricultural self-generation facility.
-1-